District of Columbia statutes.
14-501

Proof of record.

An exemplification of a record under the hand of the keeper of the record, and the seal of the court or office where the record is made, is good and sufficient evidence to prove a record made or entered in any State, territory, commonwealth or possession of the United States. The certificate of the person purporting to be the keeper of the record, accompanied by the seal, is prima facie evidence of that fact.

History

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 520
Pub. L. 88-241, § 1

Cross References

Certificate of incorporation, presumptive evidence of facts stated in certified copies, see § 29-201.36.
Corporate stock books, presumptive evidence of facts, see § 29-201.26.
Department of Insurance and Securities Regulation records, certified copies as evidence, see § 3-3616.
Domestic life insurance company, presumptive evidence of facts contained in stock book, see § 31-4415.
Fraternal benefit association, articles of association as prima facie evidence of existence and due incorporation, see § 31-5709.
Fraternal benefit association, original policies of liability of successor corporation as prima facie evidence upon division of insurance business, see § 31-5725.
Insurance superintendent, effect of authentication of papers, see § 31-4301.
Public Utilities Commission, transcribed copy of proceedings, admissibility as evidence, see § 43-622.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 14-501.
1973 Ed., § 14-501.